Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.027

Allocation of moneys for acquisition of works of art—Expenditure by arts commission—Conditions.

(1) All universities and colleges shall allocate as a nondeductible item, out of any moneys appropriated for the original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding two hundred thousand dollars of any building, an amount of one-half of one percent of the appropriation to be expended by the Washington state arts commission with the approval of the board of regents or trustees for the acquisition of works of art.

(2) For projects funded in the capital budget, an institution of higher education, working with the Washington state arts commission, may expend up to ten percent of the projected art allocation for a project during the design phase in order to select an artist and design art to be integrated in the building design. The one-half of one percent to be expended by the Washington state arts commission must be adjusted downward by the amount expended by a university or college during the design phase of the capital project.

(3) The works of art may be placed on public lands of institutions of higher education, integral to or attached to a public building or structure of institutions of higher education, detached within or outside a public building or structure of institutions of higher education, part of a portable exhibition or collection, part of a temporary exhibition, or loaned or exhibited in other public facilities.

(4) In addition to the cost of the works of art, the one-half of one percent of the appropriation shall be used to provide for the administration of the visual arts program, including conservation of the state art collection, by the Washington state arts commission and all costs for installation of the work of art. For the purpose of this section building shall not include sheds, warehouses, and other buildings of a temporary nature.

[ 2019 c 240 s 1; 2018 c 2 s 7013; 2016 sp.s. c 35 s 6008; 2005 c 36 s 3; 1983 c 204 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 2: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [January 19, 2018]." [ 2018 c 2 s 7033.]

Effective date—2016 sp.s. c 35: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 18, 2016]." [ 2016 sp.s. c 35 s 6023.]

Severability—1983 c 204: See note following RCW 43.46.090.